Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.28.050

Congress—Notices of special primary and election.

After calling a special primary and special vacancy election to fill a vacancy in the United States house of representatives or the United States senate from this state, the governor shall immediately notify the secretary of state who shall, in turn, immediately notify the county auditor of each county wholly or partly within which the vacancy exists.

Each county auditor shall publish notices of the special primary and the special vacancy election at least once in any legal newspaper published in the county, as provided by RCW 29A.52.355.

[ 2013 c 11 s 35; 2003 c 111 s 705; 1985 c 45 s 5; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 36 s 5; 1965 c 9 s 29.68.100. Prior: 1909 ex.s. c 25 s 2, part; RRS s 3800, part. Formerly RCW 29.68.100.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—1985 c 45: See note following RCW 29A.04.420.